Illinois, session 104th, HB1109.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 9A-11 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/9A-11)  (from Ch. 23, par. 9A-11)7    Sec. 9A-11. Child care. 8    (a) The General Assembly recognizes that families with 9children need child care in order to work. Child care is 10expensive and families with limited access to economic 11resources, including those who are transitioning from welfare 12to work, often struggle to pay the costs of day care. The 13General Assembly understands the importance of helping working 14families with limited access to economic resources become and 15remain self-sufficient. The General Assembly also believes 16that it is the responsibility of families to share in the costs 17of child care. It is also the preference of the General 18Assembly that all working families with limited access to 19economic resources should be treated equally, regardless of 20their welfare status.21    (b) To the extent resources permit, the Illinois 22Department shall provide child care services to parents or 23other relatives as defined by rule who are working or   HB1109- 2 -LRB104 03847 KTG 13871 b1participating in employment or Department approved education 2or training programs. At a minimum, the Illinois Department 3shall cover the following categories of families:4        (1) recipients of TANF under Article IV participating 5    in work and training activities as specified in the 6    personal plan for employment and self-sufficiency;7        (2) families transitioning from TANF to work;8        (3) families at risk of becoming recipients of TANF;9        (4) families with special needs as defined by rule;10        (5) working families with very low incomes as defined 11    by rule;12        (6) families that are not recipients of TANF and that 13    need child care assistance to participate in education and 14    training activities; 15        (7) youth in care, as defined in Section 4d of the 16    Children and Family Services Act, who are parents, 17    regardless of income or whether they are working or 18    participating in Department-approved employment or 19    education or training programs. Any family that receives 20    child care assistance in accordance with this paragraph 21    shall receive one additional 12-month child care 22    eligibility period after the parenting youth in care's 23    case with the Department of Children and Family Services 24    is closed, regardless of income or whether the parenting 25    youth in care is working or participating in 26    Department-approved employment or education or training   HB1109- 3 -LRB104 03847 KTG 13871 b1    programs;2        (8) families receiving Extended Family Support Program 3    services from the Department of Children and Family 4    Services, regardless of income or whether they are working 5    or participating in Department-approved employment or 6    education or training programs; and7        (9) families with children under the age of 5 who have 8    an open intact family services case with the Department of 9    Children and Family Services. Any family that receives 10    child care assistance in accordance with this paragraph 11    shall remain eligible for child care assistance 6 months 12    after the child's intact family services case is closed, 13    regardless of whether the child's parents or other 14    relatives as defined by rule are working or participating 15    in Department approved employment or education or training 16    programs. The Department of Early Childhood, in 17    consultation with the Department of Children and Family 18    Services, shall adopt rules to protect the privacy of 19    families who are the subject of an open intact family 20    services case when such families enroll in child care 21    services. Additional rules shall be adopted to offer 22    children who have an open intact family services case the 23    opportunity to receive an Early Intervention screening and 24    other services that their families may be eligible for as 25    provided by the Department of Human Services; and . 26        (10) beginning January 1, 2026, all child care workers   HB1109- 4 -LRB104 03847 KTG 13871 b1    with incomes at or below 325% of the federal poverty level 2    for each family size. 3    Beginning October 1, 2027, and every October 1 thereafter, 4the Department of Children and Family Services shall report to 5the General Assembly on the number of children who received 6child care via vouchers paid for by the Department of Early 7Childhood during the preceding fiscal year. The report shall 8include the ages of children who received child care, the type 9of child care they received, and the number of months they 10received child care. 11    The Department shall specify by rule the conditions of 12eligibility, the application process, and the types, amounts, 13and duration of services. Eligibility for child care benefits 14and the amount of child care provided may vary based on family 15size, income, and other factors as specified by rule.16    The Department shall update the Child Care Assistance 17Program Eligibility Calculator posted on its website to 18include a question on whether a family is applying for child 19care assistance for the first time or is applying for a 20redetermination of eligibility. 21    A family's eligibility for child care services shall be 22redetermined no sooner than 12 months following the initial 23determination or most recent redetermination. During the 2412-month periods, the family shall remain eligible for child 25care services regardless of (i) a change in family income, 26unless family income exceeds 85% of State median income, or   HB1109- 5 -LRB104 03847 KTG 13871 b1(ii) a temporary change in the ongoing status of the parents or 2other relatives, as defined by rule, as working or attending a 3job training or educational program. 4    In determining income eligibility for child care benefits, 5the Department annually, at the beginning of each fiscal year, 6shall establish, by rule, one income threshold for each family 7size, in relation to percentage of State median income for a 8family of that size, that makes families with incomes below 9the specified threshold eligible for assistance and families 10with incomes above the specified threshold ineligible for 11assistance. Through and including fiscal year 2007, the 12specified threshold must be no less than 50% of the 13then-current State median income for each family size. 14Beginning in fiscal year 2008, the specified threshold must be 15no less than 185% of the then-current federal poverty level 16for each family size. Notwithstanding any other provision of 17law or administrative rule to the contrary, beginning in 18fiscal year 2019, the specified threshold for working families 19with very low incomes as defined by rule must be no less than 20185% of the then-current federal poverty level for each family 21size. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or 22administrative rule to the contrary, beginning in State fiscal 23year 2022 through State fiscal year 2023, the specified income 24threshold shall be no less than 200% of the then-current 25federal poverty level for each family size. Beginning in State 26fiscal year 2024, the specified income threshold shall be no   HB1109- 6 -LRB104 03847 KTG 13871 b1less than 225% of the then-current federal poverty level for 2each family size. 3    In determining eligibility for assistance, the Department 4shall not give preference to any category of recipients or 5give preference to individuals based on their receipt of 6benefits under this Code.7    Nothing in this Section shall be construed as conferring 8entitlement status to eligible families.9    The Illinois Department is authorized to lower income 10eligibility ceilings, raise parent co-payments, create waiting 11lists, or take such other actions during a fiscal year as are 12necessary to ensure that child care benefits paid under this 13Article do not exceed the amounts appropriated for those child 14care benefits. These changes may be accomplished by emergency 15rule under Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative 16Procedure Act, except that the limitation on the number of 17emergency rules that may be adopted in a 24-month period shall 18not apply.19    The Illinois Department may contract with other State 20agencies or child care organizations for the administration of 21child care services.22    (c) Payment shall be made for child care that otherwise 23meets the requirements of this Section and applicable 24standards of State and local law and regulation, including any 25requirements the Illinois Department promulgates by rule. 26Through June 30, 2026, the rules of this Section include   HB1109- 7 -LRB104 03847 KTG 13871 b1licensure requirements adopted by the Department of Children 2and Family Services. On and after July 1, 2026, the rules of 3this Section include licensure requirements adopted by the 4Department of Early Childhood. In addition, the regulations of 5this Section include the Fire Prevention and Safety 6requirements promulgated by the Office of the State Fire 7Marshal, and is provided in any of the following:8        (1) a child care center which is licensed or exempt 9    from licensure pursuant to Section 2.09 of the Child Care 10    Act of 1969;11        (2) a licensed child care home or home exempt from 12    licensing;13        (3) a licensed group child care home;14        (4) other types of child care, including child care 15    provided by relatives or persons living in the same home 16    as the child, as determined by the Illinois Department by 17    rule.18    (c-5) Solely for the purposes of coverage under the 19Illinois Public Labor Relations Act, child and day care home 20providers, including licensed and license exempt, 21participating in the Department's child care assistance 22program shall be considered to be public employees and the 23State of Illinois shall be considered to be their employer as 24of January 1, 2006 (the effective date of Public Act 94-320), 25but not before. The State shall engage in collective 26bargaining with an exclusive representative of child and day   HB1109- 8 -LRB104 03847 KTG 13871 b1care home providers participating in the child care assistance 2program concerning their terms and conditions of employment 3that are within the State's control. Nothing in this 4subsection shall be understood to limit the right of families 5receiving services defined in this Section to select child and 6day care home providers or supervise them within the limits of 7this Section. The State shall not be considered to be the 8employer of child and day care home providers for any purposes 9not specifically provided in Public Act 94-320, including, but 10not limited to, purposes of vicarious liability in tort and 11purposes of statutory retirement or health insurance benefits. 12Child and day care home providers shall not be covered by the 13State Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971.14    In according child and day care home providers and their 15selected representative rights under the Illinois Public Labor 16Relations Act, the State intends that the State action 17exemption to application of federal and State antitrust laws 18be fully available to the extent that their activities are 19authorized by Public Act 94-320. 20    (d) The Illinois Department shall establish, by rule, a 21co-payment scale that provides for cost sharing by families 22that receive child care services, including parents whose only 23income is from assistance under this Code. The co-payment 24shall be based on family income and family size and may be 25based on other factors as appropriate. Co-payments may be 26waived for families whose incomes are at or below the federal   HB1109- 9 -LRB104 03847 KTG 13871 b1poverty level.2    (d-5) The Illinois Department, in consultation with its 3Child Care and Development Advisory Council, shall develop a 4plan to revise the child care assistance program's co-payment 5scale. The plan shall be completed no later than February 1, 62008, and shall include:7        (1) findings as to the percentage of income that the 8    average American family spends on child care and the 9    relative amounts that low-income families and the average 10    American family spend on other necessities of life; 11        (2) recommendations for revising the child care 12    co-payment scale to assure that families receiving child 13    care services from the Department are paying no more than 14    they can reasonably afford;15        (3) recommendations for revising the child care 16    co-payment scale to provide at-risk children with complete 17    access to Preschool for All and Head Start; and18        (4) recommendations for changes in child care program 19    policies that affect the affordability of child care. 20    (e) (Blank).21    (f) The Illinois Department shall, by rule, set rates to 22be paid for the various types of child care. Child care may be 23provided through one of the following methods:24        (1) arranging the child care through eligible 25    providers by use of purchase of service contracts or 26    vouchers;  HB1109- 10 -LRB104 03847 KTG 13871 b1        (2) arranging with other agencies and community 2    volunteer groups for non-reimbursed child care;3        (3) (blank); or4        (4) adopting such other arrangements as the Department 5    determines appropriate.6    (f-1) Within 30 days after June 4, 2018 (the effective 7date of Public Act 100-587), the Department of Human Services 8shall establish rates for child care providers that are no 9less than the rates in effect on January 1, 2018 increased by 104.26%. 11    (f-5) (Blank).12    (g) Families eligible for assistance under this Section 13shall be given the following options:14        (1) receiving a child care certificate issued by the 15    Department or a subcontractor of the Department that may 16    be used by the parents as payment for child care and 17    development services only; or18        (2) if space is available, enrolling the child with a 19    child care provider that has a purchase of service 20    contract with the Department or a subcontractor of the 21    Department for the provision of child care and development 22    services. The Department may identify particular priority 23    populations for whom they may request special 24    consideration by a provider with purchase of service 25    contracts, provided that the providers shall be permitted 26    to maintain a balance of clients in terms of household   HB1109- 11 -LRB104 03847 KTG 13871 b1    incomes and families and children with special needs, as 2    defined by rule.3(Source: P.A. 102-491, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 4102-926, eff. 5-27-22; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-594, eff. 56-25-24.)